Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2359
Public power and irrigation district funds; depositories; statement of funds on deposit.

Each depository shall furnish directly to the board of directors of the district, or to an officer of the district designated by the board, a sworn monthly statement of the funds of the district on deposit in such depository.

Laws 1941, c. 160, § 2, p. 642;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2538;

R.S.1943, § 77-2359;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 72;

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 48.